Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Assembly Hall

§ 39-5-115.
Acquisition and restoration.

The Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized to acquire and restore, by reconstruction, the Assembly Hall, a Mississippi Landmark Property in Washington, Mississippi, if the board of trustees of the department determines that sufficient architectural, historical and photographic documentation exists to achieve an accurate restoration.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized, based upon recommendations of the board of trustees of the Department of Archives and History, to utilize monies designated for the Assembly Hall project in Chapter 564, General Laws of 1993, to pay the cost of acquiring the Assembly Hall property and of restoring (by reconstruction) and interpreting Assembly Hall.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1994).

§ 39-5-117.
Operation of restored hall.

Once restored, the Assembly Hall will be operated by the Department of Archives and History in conjunction with the Jefferson College Property in Washington, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 491, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).